New York, session 2025-2026, S2114.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "vehicular violence accountability act". 3 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) and paragraphs (b) and (d) of 4 subdivision 4 of section 502 of the vehicle and traffic law, subpara- 5 graph (i) of paragraph (a) and paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 as amended 6 by chapter 379 of the laws of 2022, and paragraph (d) as amended by 7 chapter 477 of the laws of 2024, are amended and a new paragraph (c-6) 8 is added to read as follows: 9 (i) Upon submission of an application for a driver's license, the 10 applicant shall be required to take and pass a test, or submit evidence 11 of passage of a test, with respect to the laws relating to traffic, the 12 laws relating to driving while ability is impaired and while intoxicat- 13 ed, under the overpowering influence of "Road Rage", "Work Zone Safety" 14 awareness, "Motorcycle Safety" awareness and "Pedestrian and Bicyclist 15 Safety" awareness as defined by the commissioner, "School Bus Safety" 16 awareness, the laws relating to vehicular violence, the law relating to 17 exercising due care to avoid colliding with a parked, stopped or stand- 18 ing authorized emergency vehicle or hazard vehicle pursuant to section 19 eleven hundred forty-four-a of this chapter, the ability to read and 20 comprehend traffic signs and symbols and such other matters as the 21 commissioner may prescribe, and to satisfactorily complete a course 22 prescribed by the commissioner of not less than four hours and not more 23 than five hours, consisting of classroom driver training and highway 24 safety instruction or the equivalent thereof. Such test shall include at EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03537-01-5 S. 2114 2 1 least seven written questions concerning the effects of consumption of 2 alcohol or drugs on the ability of a person to operate a motor vehicle 3 and the legal and financial consequences resulting from violations of 4 section eleven hundred ninety-two of this chapter, prohibiting the oper- 5 ation of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs. 6 Such test shall include one or more written questions concerning the 7 devastating effects of "Road Rage" on the ability of a person to operate 8 a motor vehicle and the legal and financial consequences resulting from 9 assaulting, threatening or interfering with the lawful conduct of anoth- 10 er person legally using the roadway. Such test shall include one or more 11 questions concerning the potential dangers to persons and equipment 12 resulting from the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle in a work zone. 13 Such test may include one or more questions concerning motorcycle safe- 14 ty. Such test may include one or more questions concerning the law for 15 exercising due care to avoid colliding with a parked, stopped or stand- 16 ing vehicle pursuant to section eleven hundred forty-four-a of this 17 chapter. Such test may include one or more questions concerning school 18 bus safety. Such test may include one or more questions concerning 19 pedestrian and bicyclist safety. Such test may include one or more ques- 20 tions concerning vehicular violence. Such test shall be administered by 21 the commissioner. The commissioner shall cause the applicant to take a 22 vision test and a test for color blindness. Upon passage of the vision 23 test, the application may be accepted and the application fee shall be 24 payable. 25 (b) Upon successful completion of the requirements set forth in para- 26 graph (a) of this subdivision which shall include an alcohol and drug 27 education component as described in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, a 28 "Road Rage" awareness component as described in paragraph (c-1) of this 29 subdivision, a "Work Zone Safety" awareness component as described in 30 paragraph (c-2) of this subdivision, a "Motorcycle Safety" awareness 31 component as described in paragraph (c-3) of this subdivision, a "School 32 Bus Safety" awareness component as described in paragraph (c-4) of this 33 subdivision, [and] a "Pedestrian and Bicyclist Safety" awareness compo- 34 nent as described in paragraph (c-5) of this subdivision, and a vehicu- 35 lar violence awareness component as described in paragraph (c-6) of this 36 subdivision, the commissioner shall cause the applicant to take a road 37 test in a representative vehicle of a type prescribed by the commission- 38 er which shall be appropriate to the type of license for which applica- 39 tion is made, except that the commissioner may waive the road test 40 requirements for certain classes of applicants. Provided, however, that 41 the term "representative vehicle" shall not include a three-wheeled 42 motor vehicle that has two wheels situated in the front and one wheel in 43 the rear, has a steering mechanism and seating which does not require 44 the operator to straddle or sit astride, is equipped with safety belts 45 for all occupants and is manufactured to comply with federal motor vehi- 46 cle safety standards for motorcycles including, but not limited to, 49 47 C.F.R. part 571. The commissioner shall have the power to establish a 48 program to allow persons other than employees of the department to 49 conduct road tests in representative vehicles when such tests are 50 required for applicants to obtain a class A, B or C license. If [she] 51 the commissioner chooses to do so, [she] the commissioner shall set 52 forth [her] the reasons in writing and conduct a public hearing on the 53 matter. [She] The commissioner shall only establish such a program after 54 holding the public hearing. 55 (c-6) Vehicular violence awareness component. (i) The commissioner 56 shall provide in the pre-licensing course, set forth in paragraph (b) of S. 2114 3 1 this subdivision, a mandatory component in vehicular violence awareness 2 education as a prerequisite for obtaining a license to operate a motor 3 vehicle. The purpose of the component is to educate prospective licen- 4 sees on the dangers of committing a vehicular crime that causes injury 5 or death to another individual. 6 (ii) The commissioner shall establish a curriculum for the vehicular 7 violence awareness component which shall include, but shall not be 8 limited to, an overview of laws governing conduct committed while oper- 9 ating a motorized vehicle that causes injury or death to another person, 10 including but not limited to an explanation of the laws contained in 11 article one hundred twenty-six of the penal law. 12 (iii) In developing such curriculum, the commissioner shall consult 13 with the commissioner of transportation. 14 (d) (i) The commissioner shall make available for distribution upon 15 registration at each location where the pre-licensing course will be 16 given (1) instructional handbooks outlining the content of the entire 17 curriculum of the pre-licensing course including the information 18 required to be included in the course pursuant to paragraphs (c), (c-1), 19 (c-2), (c-3), (c-4) [and], (c-5) and (c-6) of this subdivision, and (2) 20 information as to how a person may register in the New York state organ 21 and tissue donor registry under section forty-three hundred ten of the 22 public health law. 23 (ii) The commissioner shall also provide for the additional training 24 of the instructors necessary for the competent instruction of the alco- 25 hol and drug education, "Road Rage" awareness, "Work Zone Safety" aware- 26 ness, "Motorcycle Safety" awareness, "School Bus Safety" awareness 27 [and], "Pedestrian and Bicyclist Safety" awareness and the vehicular 28 violence awareness subject matters of the pre-licensing course. 29 § 3. The penal law is amended by adding a new article 126 to read as 30 follows: 31 ARTICLE 126 32 VEHICULAR VIOLENCE 33 Section 126.00 Vehicular violence defined. 34 126.05 Serious physical injury by vehicle. 35 126.10 Aggravated serious physical injury by vehicle. 36 126.15 Death by vehicle. 37 126.20 Aggravated death by vehicle. 38 § 126.00 Vehicular violence defined. 39 The following definitions are applicable to this article: 40 1. "Vehicular violence" means conduct committed while operating a 41 motorized vehicle, other than driving under the influence of alcohol or 42 drugs, that negligently causes injury or death to another individual. 43 2. "Failure to exercise due care" means ordinary or civil negligence. 44 3. "A specified traffic infraction" means any moving violation reason- 45 ably related to the safety of pedestrians and bicyclists as well as any 46 of the following traffic rules or regulations as defined in section 47 eleven hundred ten (obedience to and required traffic-control devices); 48 section eleven hundred eleven (traffic-control signal indications); 49 section eleven hundred thirteen (flashing signal indications); section 50 eleven hundred twenty (drive on right side of roadway; exceptions); 51 section eleven hundred forty-two (vehicle entering stop or yield inter- 52 section); section eleven hundred forty-five (vehicle approaching rotary 53 traffic circle or island); section eleven hundred forty-six (drivers to 54 exercise due care); section eleven hundred fifty-one-a (pedestrians' 55 right of way on sidewalks); section eleven hundred sixty (required posi- 56 tion and method of turning at intersections); section eleven hundred S. 2114 4 1 sixty-one (U turns in certain areas prohibited); section eleven hundred 2 sixty-three (turning movements and required signals); section eleven 3 hundred seventy (obedience to signal indicating approach of train); 4 section eleven hundred seventy-one (certain vehicles must stop at all 5 railroad grade crossings); section eleven hundred seventy-two (stop 6 signs and yield signs); section eleven hundred seventy-three (emerging 7 from alley, driveway, private road or building); section eleven hundred 8 seventy-four (overtaking and passing school bus); section eleven hundred 9 eighty (basic rule and maximum limits); section eleven hundred eighty- 10 two (speed contests and races); section twelve hundred twelve (reckless 11 driving); section twelve hundred twenty-five (avoiding intersections or 12 traffic-control device); section twelve hundred twenty-five-a (driving 13 on sidewalks); section twelve hundred twenty-five-c (use of mobile tele- 14 phones); section twelve hundred twenty-five-d (use of portable electron- 15 ic devices) of the vehicle and traffic law; or any state or local stat- 16 ute reasonably related to the safe operation of a motor vehicle. 17 4. "Motorized vehicle" means any motor vehicle defined in the vehicle 18 and traffic law; or any motorcycle, ATV, or motor driven cycle or 19 wheeled device, other than an electrically driven mobility assistance 20 device. 21 5. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of motor vehicles of this 22 state. 23 § 126.05 Serious physical injury by vehicle. 24 A person is guilty of serious physical injury by vehicle when such 25 person fails to exercise due care while operating a motorized vehicle 26 and commits a specified traffic infraction, as defined in subdivision 27 three of section 126.00 of this article, and the commission of the spec- 28 ified traffic infraction is the proximate cause of serious physical 29 injury to another person. 30 Serious physical injury by vehicle is a class B misdemeanor. 31 § 126.10 Aggravated serious physical injury by vehicle. 32 A person is guilty of aggravated serious physical injury by vehicle 33 when such person commits the crime of serious physical injury by vehicle 34 as defined in section 126.05 of this article, and: 35 1. Knows or has reason to know that such person's license or privilege 36 of operating a motor vehicle in this state, or privilege of obtaining a 37 license to operate a motor vehicle issued by the commissioner is 38 suspended, revoked or otherwise withdrawn by the commissioner if: (a) 39 the suspension, revocation, or withdrawal was based upon a conviction of 40 a violation of any provision of section eleven hundred ninety-two of the 41 vehicle and traffic law; or (b) the suspension, revocation, or with- 42 drawal was based upon a refusal to submit to a chemical test pursuant to 43 section eleven hundred ninety-four of the vehicle and traffic law; or 44 (c) the suspension was a mandatory suspension pending prosecution of a 45 charge of a violation of section eleven hundred ninety-two of the vehi- 46 cle and traffic law ordered pursuant to paragraph (e) of subdivision two 47 of section eleven hundred ninety-three of the vehicle and traffic law or 48 other similar statute; 49 2. Has previously been convicted of violating any provision of section 50 eleven hundred ninety-two of the vehicle and traffic law within the 51 preceding ten years. For purposes of this subdivision, a conviction in 52 any other state or jurisdiction of an offense which, if committed in 53 this state, would constitute a violation of section eleven hundred nine- 54 ty-two of the vehicle and traffic law, shall be treated as a violation 55 of such law; S. 2114 5 1 3. Was driving twenty or more miles per hour above the legal speed 2 limit; 3 4. Was committing more than one specified traffic infraction as 4 defined in subdivision three of section 126.00 of this article; or 5 5. Thereby caused serious physical injury to more than one person. 6 Aggravated serious physical injury by vehicle is a class A misdemea- 7 nor. 8 § 126.15 Death by vehicle. 9 A person is guilty of death by vehicle when such person fails to exer- 10 cise due care while operating a motorized vehicle and commits a speci- 11 fied traffic infraction as defined in subdivision three of section 12 126.00 of this article, and the commission of the specified traffic 13 infraction is the proximate cause of the death of another person. 14 Death by vehicle is a class A misdemeanor. 15 § 126.20 Aggravated death by vehicle. 16 A person is guilty of aggravated death by vehicle when such person 17 commits the crime of death by vehicle as defined in section 126.15 of 18 this article, and: 19 1. Knows or has reason to know that such person's license or privilege 20 of operating a motor vehicle in this state, or privilege of obtaining a 21 license to operate a motor vehicle issued by the commissioner is 22 suspended, revoked or otherwise withdrawn by the commissioner if: (a) 23 the suspension, revocation, or withdrawal was based upon a conviction of 24 any provision of section eleven hundred ninety-two of the vehicle and 25 traffic law; or (b) the suspension, revocation, or withdrawal was based 26 upon a refusal to submit to a chemical test, pursuant to section eleven 27 hundred ninety-four of the vehicle and traffic law; or (c) the suspen- 28 sion was a mandatory suspension pending prosecution of a charge of a 29 violation of section eleven hundred ninety-two of the vehicle and traf- 30 fic law ordered pursuant to paragraph (e) of subdivision two of section 31 eleven hundred ninety-three of the vehicle and traffic law or other 32 similar statute; 33 2. Has previously been convicted of violating any provision of section 34 eleven hundred ninety-two of the vehicle and traffic law within the 35 preceding ten years. For purposes of this subdivision, a conviction in 36 any other state or jurisdiction of an offense which, if committed in 37 this state, would constitute a violation of section eleven hundred nine- 38 ty-two of the vehicle and traffic law, shall be treated as a violation 39 of such law; 40 3. Was driving twenty or more miles per hour above the legal speed 41 limit; 42 4. Was committing more than one specified traffic infraction as 43 defined in subdivision three of section 126.00 of this article; 44 5. Thereby caused the death of more than one person; or 45 6. Thereby caused the death of one person and the serious physical 46 injury of at least one other person. 47 Aggravated death by vehicle is a class E felony. 48 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 49 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.